ja_JP.dic
味無い/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
あたたかい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
あたらしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
温かい/SAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
厚い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
あつい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
熱い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
熱し/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXx
あまちょろい/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
危うい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
あらあらしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
荒くれし/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
有り合う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
難有い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
ありがたい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
言い越す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
いうばかりなし/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXx
いくする/3A3a3I3E3e
痛い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
甚い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
幼気らし/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
痛ましい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
いとう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
いとけない/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
いとわしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
今めかしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
嫌/sosggrsa
いや/sosggrsa
いらっしゃる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
煎る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
憂い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
胡散/sosgge
うすい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
うそ寂しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
打ち合う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
うっとうしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
うまし/xAxaxixIxUxExexxXAXaXiXIXUXEXeXx
浦隠る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
心悲しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
恨めしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
怨めしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
うるさい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
憂はし/xAxaxixIxUxExexxgesa
えっする/3A3a3I3E3e
おいすがう/4A4I4E4U
御出でなさる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubV2
おいでなさる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubV2
雄雄し/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
おおまか/sosgsa
おかしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
おさない/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
おじけだつ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
おそれおおい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
おっくう/sosggrsa
仰る/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
仰有る/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
おっしゃる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKNV2
鬼鬼し/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
思しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
重い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
思い迷う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
おもおもしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
面映い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
おろかなし/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXx
飼い馴らす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
攪する/3A3a3I3E3e
匿まう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
頑はし/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
かたくるしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
かたひく/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
かだん/sosgsa
悲しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
か細い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
辛い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
からい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
かるい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
かるがるしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
かわりあう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
寛容/sosgsa
がいす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN3A3a3I3E3e
きしりあう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
きのどく/sosggr
気細い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
極り悪い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
きも可愛い/GRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
窮屈/sosggrgesa
きゅうくつ/sosggrgesa
きょうしゅく/sosggr
きょうじん/sosgsa
狂する/3A3a3I3E3e
兇暴/sosgsa
ぎょうぎょうしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
くさい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
下さる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubV2
くださる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubV2
くちぎたない/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
暮す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
狂う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
ぐうす/3A3a3I3E3e
穢らわしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
異し/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
けたたましい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
けち/sosgsa
けっぺき/sosgsa
煙たい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
けむたい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
堅実/sosgsami
けんじつ/sosgsami
険難/sosggrsa
けんのん/sosggrsa
狡猾/sosgsa
こうが/sosgsa
神神しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
寇す/3A3a3I3E3e
心太し/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXx
こざかしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
こすい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
こちごちし/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
こっけい/sosgsa
小生意気/sosgsa
小難しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
こわい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESGSOXKToXQXrXO
御座なさる/SISEV2
ござなさる/SISEV2
御座る/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBub
ござる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBub
御覧なさる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubV2
ごらんなさる/SISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubV2
ごろうず/3A3a3I3E3e
嘖む/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
さいみつ/sosgsa
差し添う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4UV2
殺風景/sosgsa
寂しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
淋しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
さもしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
残念/sosggrsa
為損ずる/3A3a3I3E3e
しだく/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
しどけない/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
仕舞う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
しゅうばつ/sosgsa
周密/sosgsa
小便臭い/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
処する/3A3a3I3E3e
白い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
真剣/sosgsami
しんけん/sosgsami
真実/sosgsami
しんじつ/sosgsami
親切/sosggesami
深切/sosggesami
しんせつ/sosggesami
新鮮/sosgsami
しんせん/sosgsami
しんぱい/sosgge
しんみつ/sosggesa
じっちょく/sosggesa
自慢/sosgge
邪悪/sosgsa
じゃくたい/sosgsa
術無い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
清清しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
すさまじい/GRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
進まし/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
漫く/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
酸っぱい/GRSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
素敵/sosgsa
素晴らしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
速やか/sosgsa
ずるがしこい/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
制す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN3A3a3I3E3e
僭越/sosgsa
副う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4UV2
そうぞうしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
粗暴/sosgsa
粗末/sosgsa
属す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN3A3a3I3E3e
倒す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
たくましい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
たっとい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
喩ふ/4A4I4E4UV2
頼もしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
たのもしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
出し渋る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
小ちゃい/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
ちからない/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
ちゃんちゃらおかしい/GRGESAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
ちゅうじつ/sosggesa
沖する/3A3a3I3E3e
つきしろう/4A4I4E4U
つのぐむ/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
手堅い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
てくださる/SISE
てどおし/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXx
出合う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
でござる/SISE
等閑ない/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
投ず/3A3a3I3E3e
唐突/sosgsa
とうめい/sosgsa
当惑/sosgge
とくい/sosggrgesa
飛び移る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
羨し/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
執行う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
どくどくしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
なげきあかす/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
なごりおしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
為さる/SISESISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubV2
なさる/SISESISE5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubV2
腥い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
なみだぐましい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
緩い/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
狎々しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
苦い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
にがい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
憎憎しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
逃迷う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
佞する/3A3a3I3E3e
妬ましい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
ねつっぽい/SASGSOXKToXQXrXO
はがいい/GRSGSOXKToXQXrXO
歯痒い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
白い/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
劇しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
恥ずかしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
斫る/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
歯向かう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
腹黒い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
比する/3A3a3I3E3e
ひつう/sosgsa
人臭い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
ひにく/sosgsa
陳くろし/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
ひらべったい/SASGSOXKToXQXrXO
美美しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
ふあん/sosggrge
ふきょう/sosgge
ふしぎ/sosggrsa
不審/sosggrgesa
ふじょうり/sosgsa
不注意/sosgsa
ふふく/sosgge
ふまん/sosgge
ふゆかい/sosggesa
振り合う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
ふりつもる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
故い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
無気味/sosggrsa
僻する/3A3a3I3E3e
放胆/sosgsa
誇らしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
奔放/sosgsa
まことし/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
真っ黒い/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
抹香臭い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
真っ白い/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
まめまめしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
まるい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
慢ずる/3A3a3I3E3e
むきあう/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
むさい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
むさ苦しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
むさくろしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
蒸返す/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
むずかしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
無駄/sosgsa
無統制/sosgsa
虚しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
無念/sosggrsa
迷惑/sosggrgesa
めいわく/sosggrgesa
面倒/sosggrsa
物憂い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
ものこいし/xAxaxixIxUxExexx
ものすごい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
物欲しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
物珍しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
やさしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
やすい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
安ぼったい/SGSOXKToXQXrXO
軟らかい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSAMISGSOXKToXQXrXO
ゆうする/3A3a3I3E3e
ゆかい/sosggrgesa
緩かしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
陽気/sosggrsa
欲深/sosgsa
寄合う/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN4A4I4E4U
宜しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
よわまる/5A5I5T5E5OBDUYUBubKN
立派/sosgsa
るいする/3A3a3I3E3e
若若しい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
訳無い/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
わけない/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSGSOXKToXQXrXO
わすれがたい/XAXaXiXIXUXEXeXxSASGSOXKToXQXrXO
わずらわしい/xAxaxixIxUxExexxGRGESASGSOXKToXQXrXO
